Utah statutes.
7-22-103.   Registration -- Fees -- Qualifications.

(1) (a)  Each escrow agent shall register with the department annually on or before July 15 of each year and pay a registration fee of $100.

(b)  Registration of an escrow agent in accordance with this section includes all directors, officers, employees, and representatives of the escrow agent while acting in the course of its business.

(2)  Each escrow agent shall provide a financial statement and any other information requested by the department when submitting each annual application for registration.

